District of Columbia statutes.
1-604.01

Policy.

It is the intent of the Council that the District’s personnel management system provide for equitable application of appropriate rules or regulations among all agencies. Further, it is the intent of the Council that the rules, regulations, and standards issued by the personnel authorities under this chapter should be as flexible and responsive as possible and reflect an awareness of innovation in the fields of modern personnel management and public administration.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 401, 25 DCR 5740

Cross References

Merit system, educational employees, coverage, see § 1-602.03.
Merit system, effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.
Merit system, organization for personnel management, rules and regulations, see § 1-604.04.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-604.1.
1973 Ed., § 1-334.1.

Editor's Notes

Assessment of need for and availability of bilingual and multicultural government personnel: D.C. Law 10-238 directed that the Mayor and each independent personnel authority shall establish a Committee of Language Diversity and shall make as assessment of the need for bilingual and multicultural personnel within their respective agencies.